Hawaii statutes.
§157-33 Order fixing minimum price, salvage
value. (a) Without regard to the notice and public hearing requirements
of chapter 91 and based on the specific formulas or criteria adopted under
section 157-31(a)(2), the board may establish by order the minimum prices and
salvage values for milk to be paid to producers by producer-distributors and
distributors.

(1) Prior to the effective date of any order, the
department shall give public notice that includes:

(A) Either a statement of the substance of the
proposed order; or a statement of the minimum prices or salvage values for milk
to be established, and

(B) A statement that a copy of the proposed
order will be mailed to any interested person who requests a copy, together
with a description of where and how the requests may be made.

(2) The notice shall be mailed to all persons who
have made a timely written request of the department for advance notice of
these orders or of the department's rulemaking proceedings. The department may
require reimbursement for the cost of preparing and mailing the copies.

(b) The minimum prices and salvage values
within each milk shed may vary according to the classes or classifications
established by the board; provided that the minimum prices and salvage values
for each such class or classification within a milk shed shall be uniform. The
minimum prices and salvage values may vary from county to county. The board
may adopt rules to prescribe how producers shall be paid for milk sold by them
to distributors and producer-distributors. [L 1967, c 260, §22; HRS §157-33; am
L 1971, c 184, pt of §4; ree L 1972, c 40, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 118, §§3, 6;
am L 1998, c 2, §32 and c 19, §1; am L 2004, c 20, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next